Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1585
Decommissioning, defined.

Decommissioning shall mean final operational activities at a facility to dismantle site structures, to decontaminate site surfaces and remaining structures, to stabilize and contain residual radioactive material, and to carry out any other activities to prepare the site for postoperational care.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 8.